sv: Burkinidelar som ingår: Caprileggings; Klänning; Huvudduk; Hijab; Leggings; Kjolpanel; Badmössa; Topp; Tunika; Övrigt
pt-PT: Peças de burkini incluídas: Leggings capri; Vestido; Cobertura de cabeça; Hijab; Leggings; Painel de saia; Toca de natação; Parte superior; Túnica; Outro
en: Burkini pieces included: Capri leggings; Dress; Head covering; Hijab; Leggings; Skirt panel; Swim cap; Top; Tunic; Other
hr-HR: Uključeni komadi burkinija: Capri tajice; Haljina; Pokrivalo za glavu; Hidžab; Tajice; Dio sa suknjom; Kapa za plivanje; Gornji dio; Tunika; Ostalo
tr: Dahil edilen burkini parçaları: Kapri tayt; Elbise; Başörtüsü; Hicap; Tayt; Etek paneli; Bone; Üst; Tunik; Diğer
it: Pezzi del burkini inclusi: Leggings capri; Vestito; Copricapo; Hijab; Leggings; Pannello gonna; Cuffia da nuoto; Top; Tunica; Altro
ru: Состав комплекта буркини: Леггинсы-капри; Платье; Головной убор; Хиджаб; Леггинсы; Юбка; Шапочка для плавания; Верх; Туника; Другое
nl: Inbegrepen burkini-onderdelen: Caprilegging; Jurk; Hoofdbedekking; Hijab; Legging; Rokpaneel; Badmuts; Topje; Tuniek; Overig
zh-TW: 包含布基尼件數: 七分內搭褲; 洋裝; 頭巾; 希賈布; 內搭褲; 裙擺設計; 泳帽; 上衣; 長版上衣; 其他
pl: Dołączono elementy burkini: Legginsy capri; Sukienka; Nakrycie głowy; Hidżab; Legginsy; Panel spódnicowy; Czepek pływacki; Top; Tunika; Inne
ro-RO: Piese de burkini incluse: Colanți Capri; Rochie; Acoperământ cap; Hijab; Colanți; Panou fustă; Cască de înot; Top; Tunică; Altele
pt-BR: Peças do biquíni incluídas: Leggings capri; Vestido; Cobertura de cabeça; Hijab; Leggings; Painel de saia; Touca de natação; Blusa; Túnica; Outros
el: Περιλαμβάνονται κομμάτια μπουρκίνι: Κολάν κάπρι; Φόρεμα; Κάλυμμα κεφαλιού; Χιτζάμπ; Κολάν; Τμήμα φούστας; Σκουφάκι κολύμβησης; Τοπ; Τουνίκ; Άλλο
th: ชิ้นส่วนที่รวมมาในชุดเบอร์กินี: กางเกงเลกกิ้งห้าส่วน; ชุดเดรส; ผ้าคลุมศีรษะ; ฮิญาบ; กางเกงเลกกิ้ง; ชิ้นส่วนกระโปรง; หมวกว่ายน้ำ; เสื้อ; เสื้อคลุมยาว; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Priloženi deli za burkini: Kapri pajkice; Obleka; Pokrivalo; Hidžab; Pajkice; Panel krila; Plavalna kapa; Zgornji del; Tunika; Drugo
vi: Các món đi kèm của bộ đồ bơi Burkini: Quần legging lửng; Váy; Khăn trùm đầu; Khăn Hijab; Quần legging; Phần chân váy; Mũ bơi; Áo; Áo dáng dài; Khác
sk-SK: Vrátane jednotlivých dielov burkini: Trojštvrťové legíny; Šaty; Pokrývka hlavy; Hidžáb; Legíny; Sukňový panel; Kúpacia čiapka; Vrchný diel; Tunika; Iné
fi: Mukana tulevat burkini-setin osat: Capri-leggingsit; Mekko; Päänpeite; Hijab; Leggingsit; Hameosa; Uimalakki; Yläosa; Tunika; Muu
hu: Burkini részei a csomagban: Capri leggings; Ruha; Fejkendő; Hidzsáb; Leggings; Szoknyarész; Úszósapka; Felső; Tunika; Egyéb
ja: ブルキニピース付き: カプリレギンス; ドレス; ヘッドカバー; ヒジャブ; レギンス; スカートパネル; スイムキャップ; トップ; チュニック; その他
zh-CN: 包括布基尼单品: 七分紧身裤; 连衣裙; 头巾; 希贾布; 紧身裤; 裙摆; 泳帽; 上装; 罩衫; 其他
fr: Pièces de burkini incluses: Legging corsaire; Robe; Couvre-chef; Hijab; Legging; Panneau de jupe; Bonnet de bain; Haut; Tunique; Autre
nb: Inkluderte burkinideler: Capri-tights; Kjole; Hodeplagg; Hijab; Leggings; Skjørtpanel; Badehette; Overdel; Tunika; Annet
de: Inbegriffene Burkiniteile: Capri-Leggings; Kleid; Kopfbedeckung; Hijab; Leggings; Rockteil; Badekappe; Oberteil; Tunika; Sonstiges
da: Burkinidele medfølger: Capri-leggings; Kjole; Hovedbeklædning; Hijab; Leggings; Skørt; Badehætte; Top; Tunika; Andet
es: Piezas de burkini incluidas: Leggings capri; Vestido; Cobertura para la cabeza; Hiyab; Leggings; Panel de falda; Gorro de natación; Top; Túnica; Otra
lt-LT: Į komplektą įeinančios burkinio dalys: Kaprio tamprės; Suknelė; Galvos apdangalas; Hidžabas; Tamprės; Sijono dalis; Plaukimo kepuraitė; Viršutinė dalis; Tunika; Kitas
ko: 버키니 포함 구성품: 카프리 레깅스; 드레스; 헤드 커버링; 히잡; 레깅스; 스커트 패널; 수영모; 상의; 튜닉; 기타
cs: Včetně dílů na burkini: Tříčtvrteční legíny; Šaty; Pokrývka hlavy; Hidžáb; Legíny; Sukňový díl; Koupací čepice; Top; Tunika; Jiné
bg-BG: С включени части на буркини: Клин капри; Рокля; Покритие за глава; Хиджаб; Клин; Панел за пола; Плувна шапка; Горнище; Туника; Друго